Mississippi, session 2026, HB1300.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the Mississippi Office of Homeland Security to assist in paying costs associated with the Mississippi Search and Rescue Program created by House Bill No. ______, 2026 Regular Session, as described in Section 2, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027...... ....................................................$1,525,000.00. SECTION 2.  The Mississippi Office of Homeland Security shall allocate the funds appropriated under Section 1 of this act as follows: (a)  Seven Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($750,000.00) for the WMD Program, LEO Task Force and US&R Program; (b)  One Hundred Seventy Five Thousand Dollars ($175,000.00) for US&R equipment acquisition, equipment repair and maintenance for MS Task Force 1; (c)  One Hundred Seventy Five Thousand Dollars ($175,000.00) for US&R equipment acquisition, equipment repair and maintenance for MS Task Force 2; (d)  One Hundred Seventy Five Thousand Dollars ($175,000.00) for US&R equipment acquisition, equipment repair and maintenance for MS Task Force 3; (e)  One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) for search and rescue training for the Meridian Public Safety Training Facility; and (f)  One Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($150,000.00) for US&R equipment repair, maintenance and response cost for Type I Team Development. SECTION 3.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.